Utah statutes.
70A-2a-104.   Leases subject to other law.
(1)  A lease, although subject to this chapter, is also subject to any
applicable:
(a)  certificate of title statute of this state;
(b)  certificate of title statute of another jurisdiction as provided in
Section 70A-2a-105;
(c)  consumer protection statute of this state; or
(d)  final consumer protection decision of a court of this state as of July 1,
1993.
(2)  In case of conflict between this chapter (other than Section 70A-2a-105
and Subsections 70A-2a-304(3) and 70A-2a-305(3)) and a statute or decision
referred to in Subsection (1), the statute or decision controls.
(3)  Failure to comply with any applicable law has only the effect specified
in that law.
